District of Columbia statutes.
47-4404

Compromise of tax.

If the Mayor believes there is a reasonable doubt as to the liability of the taxpayer or the collectibility of the tax imposed under this title, the Mayor may compromise the tax.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334

History